test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-mîcisow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mîcisow : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nimîcison   # I eat, I have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kimîcison   # you eat, you have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: mîcisow   # he/she eats, he/she has a meal

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-mîcisoyân   # as I eat, as I have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-mîcisoyan, î-mîcisoyin]   # as you eat, as you have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-mîcisot   # as he/she eats, as he/she has a meal

      # Imp
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîciso   # (you) eat now, (you) have a meal now
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nimîcison   # I eat, I have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kimîcison   # you eat, you have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: mîcisow   # he/she eats, he/she has a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nimîcisonân   # we eat, we have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kimîcisonaw, kimîcisonânaw]   # we and you eat, we and you have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kimîcisonâwâw   # you all eat, you all have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: mîcisowak   # they eat, they have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: mîcisothiwa   # another/others eat, another/others have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+X: [mîcisonâniwiw, mîcisonâniwan]   # someone eats, someone has a meal
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-mîcisoyân   # as I eat, as I have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-mîcisoyan, î-mîcisoyin]   # as you eat, as you have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-mîcisot   # as he/she eats, as he/she has a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-mîcisoyâhk   # as we eat, as we have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-mîcisoyahk   # as we and you eat, as we and you have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-mîcisoyîk   # as you all eat, as you all have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-mîcisocik, î-mîcisotwâw]   # as they eat, as they have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-mîcisothit   # as another/others eat, as another/others have a meal
      PV/î+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-mîcisonâniwik, î-mîcisonâniwahk, î-mîcisohk]   # as someone eats, as someone has a meal
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-mîcison   # I ate, I had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-mîcison   # you ate, you had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kî-mîcisow   # he/she ate, he/she had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-mîcisonân   # we ate, we had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-mîcisonaw, kikî-mîcisonânaw]   # we and you ate, we and you had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-mîcisonâwâw   # you all ate, you all had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: kî-mîcisowak   # they ate, they had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-mîcisothiwa   # another/others ate, another/others had a meal
      PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+X: [kî-mîcisonâniwiw, kî-mîcisonâniwan]   # someone ate, someone had a meal
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-mîcisoyân   # as I ate, as I had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-mîcisoyan, î-kî-mîcisoyin]   # as you ate, as you had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-mîcisot   # as he/she ate, as he/she had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-mîcisoyâhk   # as we ate, as we had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-mîcisoyahk   # as we and you ate, as we and you had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-mîcisoyîk   # as you all ate, as you all had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kî-mîcisocik, î-kî-mîcisotwâw]   # as they ate, as they had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-mîcisothit   # as another/others ate, as another/others had a meal
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-mîcisonâniwik, î-kî-mîcisonâniwahk, î-kî-mîcisohk]   # as someone ate, as someone had a meal
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-mîcison   # I am going to eat, I am going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-mîcison   # you are going to eat, you are going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wî-mîcisow   # he/she is going to eat, he/she is going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-mîcisonân   # we are going to eat, we are going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-mîcisonaw, kiwî-mîcisonânaw]   # we and you are going to eat, we and you are going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-mîcisonâwâw   # you all are going to eat, you all are going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wî-mîcisowak   # they are going to eat, they are going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-mîcisothiwa   # another/others are going to eat, another/others are going to have a meal
      PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+X: [wî-mîcisonâniwiw, wî-mîcisonâniwan]   # someone is going to eat, someone is going to have a meal
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-mîcisoyân   # as I am going to eat, as I am going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-mîcisoyan, î-wî-mîcisoyin]   # as you are going to eat, as you are going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-mîcisot   # as he/she is going to eat, as he/she is going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-mîcisoyâhk   # as we are going to eat, as we are going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-mîcisoyahk   # as we and you are going to eat, as we and you are going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-mîcisoyîk   # as you all are going to eat, as you all are going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-wî-mîcisocik, î-wî-mîcisotwâw]   # as they are going to eat, as they are going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-mîcisothit   # as another/others are going to eat, as another/others are going to have a meal
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-mîcisonâniwik, î-wî-mîcisonâniwahk, î-wî-mîcisohk]   # as someone is going to eat, as someone is going to have a meal
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nika-mîcison   # I will eat, I will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kika-mîcison   # you will eat, you will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: ka-mîcisow   # he/she will eat, he/she will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nika-mîcisonân   # we will eat, we will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-mîcisonaw, kika-mîcisonânaw]   # we and you will eat, we and you will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kika-mîcisonâwâw   # you all will eat, you all will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: ka-mîcisowak   # they will eat, they will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-mîcisothiwa   # another/others will eat, another/others will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+X: [ka-mîcisonâniwiw, ka-mîcisonâniwan]   # someone will eat, someone will have a meal
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-mîcisoyân   # I will eat, I will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-mîcisoyan, ka-mîcisoyin]   # you will eat, you will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-mîcisot   # he/she will eat, he/she will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-mîcisoyâhk   # we will eat, we will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-mîcisoyahk   # we and you will eat, we and you will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-mîcisoyîk   # you all will eat, you all will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ka-mîcisocik, ka-mîcisotwâw]   # they will eat, they will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-mîcisothit   # another/others will eat, another/others will have a meal
      PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ka-mîcisonâniwik, ka-mîcisonâniwahk, ka-mîcisohk]   # someone will eat, someone will have a meal
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-mîcisoyân   # I eat, I have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-mîcisoyan, ta-mîcisoyin]   # you eat, you have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-mîcisot   # he/she eats, he/she has a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-mîcisoyâhk   # we eat, we have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-mîcisoyahk   # we and you eat, we and you have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-mîcisoyîk   # you all eat, you all have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ta-mîcisocik, ta-mîcisotwâw]   # they eat, they have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-mîcisothit   # another/others eat, another/others have a meal
      PV/ta+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ta-mîcisonâniwik, ta-mîcisonâniwahk, ta-mîcisohk]   # someone eats, someone has a meal
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mîcisoyâni   # when I eat, when I have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [mîcisoyani, mîcisoyini]   # when you eat, when you have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mîcisoci   # when he/she eats, when he/she has a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mîcisoyâhki   # when we eat, when we have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: mîcisoyahki   # when we and you eat, when we and you have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mîcisoyîko   # when you all eat, when you all have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mîcisotwâwi   # when they eat, when they have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mîcisothici   # when another/others eat, when another/others have a meal
      mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+X: [mîcisohki, mîcisohkwâwi]   # when someone eats, when someone has a meal
      

      # Imp # Imm
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîciso   # (you) eat now, (you) have a meal now
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcisotân   # let you and us eat now, let you and us have a meal now
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcisok   # (you all) eat now, (you all) have a meal now
      

      # Imp # Del
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcisohkan   # (you) eat later, (you) have a meal later
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcisohkahk   # let you and us eat later, let you and us have a meal later
      mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcisohkîk   # (you all) eat later, (you all) have a meal later
      
